Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 11 Freshwater Fishing

20-11-1.
Fishing for which license required.

No person fifteen (15) years old or older shall catch or take any fish in any freshwater stream or freshwater pond within this state, or place or operate or superintend any device for the purpose of taking or catching fish in any of those waters, without having first obtained a license; provided, however, that a license shall not be required of any resident of this state, or the members of the resident’s immediate family, to fish in any brook or pond running through or bordering upon land owned or leased by the resident and on which the resident is actually domiciled, nor those individuals exempted under §

20-2-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 549, § 3.

20-11-2.
Closed season.

No person shall catch, or attempt to catch, or take any species of fish in any pond or stream stocked with trout by the department of environmental management or in any waters set apart by the department in which trout might be found, except during the open seasons, and subject to the catch and size limits, and regulations as to the method of taking, as established by the director pursuant to §

20-1-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-3.
Fishing devices allowed.

Unless otherwise specified by regulations adopted by the department of environmental management, only a rod and reel or other device held in and operated by hand shall be used to catch, or attempt to catch, fish in the freshwaters of the state, except that suckers, fall fish, and carp may be taken by snares, spears, or bow and arrow, and minnows may be taken as provided in §§

20-11-7

—

20-11-9

. No person shall place, operate, or superintend more than two (2) of those devices for the purpose of taking or catching fish at any time, and no more than three (3) hooks may be attached to each device; provided, however, that for the purpose of fishing through ice upon the surface of any stream or freshwater pond, any person may place, operate, or superintend five (5) lines, with a single hook upon each and held by any device designed for that purpose, and provided further that every one of those lines shall be attended by a person lawfully permitted to catch fish.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-4.
Artificially cultivated fish.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the taking and possession, at any time of the year, fish artificially cultivated in private ponds. For the purpose of this section, a “private pond” is defined as a body of water that is completely in the ownership of one taxpayer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-5.
Sale of freshwater fish.

No person shall sell, or offer for sale, within this state, any trout, black bass, pickerel, northern pike, Atlantic salmon, American shad, or yellow perch taken from any freshwater streams, rivers, ponds, or lakes within the jurisdiction of this state, excepting any of these fish that are artificially cultivated in private ponds as authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-6.
Stocking of streams and ponds.

No person shall stock any freshwater stream or pond within this state with any species of fish, or place or liberate any fish in any freshwater stream or pond within this state, without having first obtained a permit from the department of environmental management. No person shall place, operate, or superintend any device intended for the purpose of taking or catching fish in any private pond, brook, stream, or reserve, or any other place made, constructed, or used for the purpose of breeding or growing fish, without the consent of the proprietor or lessee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-7.
License required for selling freshwater minnows.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or barter, or engage in the business of taking or catching for the purpose of selling or bartering, freshwater live minnows for bait, or to possess more than one hundred (100) freshwater live minnows, without first procuring a license from the department of environmental management. For the purpose of this chapter, “freshwater minnows” shall be defined to include all minnows and the young of all species of freshwater fish except the game species, trout, northern pike, pickerel, largemouth bass, smallmouth bass, shad, Atlantic salmon, and alewives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 107, § 2.

20-11-8.
Authorized traps, seines, and nets.

Freshwater minnows, not including the young of any species of game fish, may be lawfully taken for bait with minnow traps, dip nets, and seines of the dimensions of not more than eight feet (8´) in length and four feet (4´) in depth and having a mesh not larger than one-quarter of an inch (1/4") in any waters of this state. The possession and use of minnow seines larger than the dimensions specified in this section, unless otherwise provided, shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-9.
Larger seines used by licensees.

Minnow seines of greater dimensions than authorized in §

20-11-8

may be lawfully possessed and used by a person licensed under this chapter, in the waters specified by the director of environmental management; provided, that no minnow seines so licensed shall exceed fifty feet (50´) in length and eight feet (8´) in depth and shall have a mesh larger than one-quarter of an inch (1/4"); provided further, that upon the payment of an additional ten dollars ($10.00) for each twenty-five feet (25´), a seine over fifty feet (50´) in length and up to one hundred feet (100´) can be used.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-11-10.
Injurious substances.

No person shall place, deposit, or explode any substance injurious to the health or life of fish in any stream or freshwater pond within this state; provided, however, a person may obtain a permit issued by the director of environmental management to use certain chemicals for the eradication of vegetation and control of fish populations under regulations promulgated by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 30, § 4.

20-11-11 — 20-11-19.
[Reserved.]

20-11-20.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who violates any rule or regulation made under the provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Jurisdiction over violations of this chapter shall be with the traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 372, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 4.

20-11-21.
Jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the traffic tribunal shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine all violations specified in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 372, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 4.